Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1007.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Chapter 5 of Title 34 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER FDETERRENT FENCING COST-SHARE PROGRAMSec.571. Definitions.572. Deterrent Fencing Cost-Share Program.573. Deterrent Fencing Cost-Share Program Fund.574. Deterrent fencing.575. Eligibility.576. Application.123456789101112131415161718 577. Disbursement and construction.578. Unlawful acts.579. Review.§ 571. Definitions. The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Crop." As defined in 3 Pa.C.S. § 10502 (relating to definitions)."Department." The Department of Agriculture of the Commonwealth."Eligible landowner." A person who owns or leases eligible property, meets the criteria under section 575 (relating to eligibility) and who has experienced verifiable crop damage."Fund." The Deterrent Fencing Cost-Share Program Fund established under section 573 (relating to Deterrent Fencing Cost-Share Program Fund)."Normal agricultural operation." As defined under section 2 of the act of June 10, 1982 (P.L.454, No.133), referred to as the Right-to-Farm Law."Program." The Deterrent Fencing Cost-Share Program established under section 572 (relating to Deterrent Fencing Cost-Share Program)."Verifiable crop damage." Crop damage caused by wildlife as certified by the department under section 572(c)(1).§ 572. Deterrent Fencing Cost-Share Program.(a) Establishment.--The Deterrent Fencing Cost-Share Program is established. The purpose of the program is to provide deterrent fencing for eligible landowners to mitigate verifiable crop damage, thereby supporting agricultural productivity in 20250HB1007PN1162 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 this Commonwealth.(b) Cost-sharing requirement.--The cost of constructing deterrent fencing under the program shall be shared equally by the commission and the eligible landowner.(c) Administration.--The program shall be administered by the department, which shall:(1) Certify crop damage caused by wildlife, based on criteria requiring:(i) Documentation of at least 10% crop loss attributable to wildlife damage within the location to be fenced.(ii) Physical evidence of the type of animal causing the crop damage, verified through photographs, tracks or other material proof.(iii) An in-person assessment conducted by department personnel or a third party contracted by the department to validate the crop damage and the presence of wildlife responsible for the crop damage.(2) Ensure adherence to construction specifications under section 574 (relating to deterrent fencing).(3) Review and certify eligible landowner deterrent fencing under section 577(d) (relating to d isbursement and construction ). § 573. Deterrent Fencing Cost-Share Program Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Deterrent Fencing Cost-Share Program Fund is established within the State Treasury. The commission shall administer the fund for the purposes of this subchapter. Money in the fund shall be used for cost sharing under this subchapter.(b) Sources.--The fund shall consist of:20250HB1007PN1162 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Money transferred or appropriated to the fund for the program.(2) Money recovered under section 577(e) (relating to disbursement and construction).(c) Appropriations.--Money in the fund is appropriated on a continuing basis to the commission for the purposes of this subchapter. The State Treasurer shall credit all interest and income derived from the deposit and investment of money in the fund to the fund. Unexpended and unencumbered money remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse, but the State Treasurer shall transfer any money remaining in the fund at the end of the 2035-2036 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter to the Game Fund.(d) Costs.--The department may use up to 1% of the money in the fund to cover the costs that the department incurs in administering the program.(e) Allocation.--Funding for the program shall be allocated by the commission from the Game Fund yearly in a lump sum allocation of $4,000,000 for the first year and then in lump sum allocations of $2,000,000 and made available to eligible landowners until July 1, 2036.§ 574. Deterrent fencing.(a) Specifications.--The commission shall promulgate regulations establishing specifications for deterrent fencing construction. The specifications shall consider:(1) The type of wildlife targeted.(2) The height and necessary materials.(3) Topographical considerations.(4) Geographic location.(b) Projected materials cost metrics.--The commission shall 20250HB1007PN1162 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 promulgate regulations for cost metrics for the construction of deterrent fencing, based on projected material costs required to meet the specifications of subsection (a).(c) Projected labor cost metrics.--The commission shall promulgate regulations for cost metrics for the labor utilized in the construction of deterrent fencing.(d) Annual review and update.--The commission shall review and, if necessary, update the specifications and cost metrics under this section on an annual basis to reflect changes in material costs, construction standards or other relevant factors, based on the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area for the most recent 12-month period for which figures have been officially reported by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics.§ 575. Eligibility.(a) Property.--Eligible properties for cost-share assistance must:(1) qualify as a normal agricultural operation ; and (2) meet criteria under section 572(c)(1) (relating to Deterrent Fencing Cost-Share Program).(b) Public hunting.--An eligible landowner shall not be required to permit public hunting on their property to qualify for eligibility under the program.(c) Previous depredation efforts.--An eligible landowner must utilize an agricultural depredation program permitted under Subchapter B of Chapter 21 (relating to destruction for agricultural protection) for at least two consecutive years immediately prior to the date of application.(d) Lessees.--A person who leases eligible property meeting 20250HB1007PN1162 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the criteria under subsection (a) shall require notarized written permission from the owner of the property to construct deterrent fencing in each location noted in the application under section 576(b)(2) (relating to application) at least 365 days prior to the date of application.§ 576. Application.(a) Process.--An eligible landowner seeking cost-share assistance for deterrent fencing under this subchapter must submit an application to the department in a form and manner prescribed by the department. A copy of the application shall be provided by the department to the commission in a manner prescribed by the commission within five days of receipt by the department.(b) Requirements.--The application under subsection (a) shall include:(1) Documentation demonstrating that the applicant meets the eligibility requirements under section 575 (relating to eligibility).(2) A description of the proposed deterrent fencing project, including details on the type of wildlife to be deterred, estimated length and location of the fencing and an outline of fencing materials to be used consistent with the commission's regulations promulgated under section 574 (relating to deterrent fencing).(3) An estimate of the total deterrent fencing project costs based on material costs as determined by the commission's cost metrics under section 574(b).(4) If the application is submitted by a lessee, notarized written permission required under section 575(d).(c) Review and approval.--The department shall review each 20250HB1007PN1162 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 application to determine eligibility and completeness and shall approve or deny the application within 60 days of receipt. If approved, the department shall notify the applicant of the approved funding amount and the conditions under which the approved funding may be utilized.(d) Compliance.--Each approved project shall comply with fencing construction specifications under section 574, and the disbursement of funding shall be conditioned upon the applicant's agreement to meet the specifications.(e) Denial.--If an application is denied, the department shall provide written notice to the applicant stating the reasons for denial. The eligible landowner may not reapply until at least 60 days have elapsed after the denial.§ 577. Disbursement and construction.(a) Disbursement.--(1) Upon approval of an application for cost-share assistance under section 576(c) (relating to application), the commission shall disburse 50% of the approved total project cost directly to the eligible landowner, upon written request of the eligible landowner for the money. The written request must be made within three months of the project approval by the department.(2) If the total material or labor costs for an approved project exceed the initial estimates provided by the commission, the eligible landowner may submit a request for additional funding within three months of receipt of the initial disbursement. The request shall include documentation of actual costs incurred and justification for the additional expenses. The commission may, at its discretion, grant or deny the request for additional funding.20250HB1007PN1162 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Construction time.--The eligible landowner shall complete the construction of the approved deterrent fencing project within nine months of receiving the money.(c) Construction method.--The eligible landowner may:(1) construct the deterrent fencing in accordance with the construction specifications under section 574 (relating to deterrent fencing); or(2) contract with a third party to construct the deterrent fencing if the third party complies with the construction specifications under section 574.(d) Final review and certification.--(1) Upon notification by the eligible landowner of project completion, the department shall conduct an in-person review within 30 days to verify that the fencing was constructed in accordance with requirements under this subchapter and the approved application.(2) If the project meets or exceeds the requirements specified in the approved application, and follows the construction specifications under section 574, the department shall issue a certification of compliance to the eligible landowner.(3) If the project does not meet the requirements under this subchapter, the department shall notify the eligible landowner of deficiencies within five days of review. The eligible landowner shall have 30 days following receipt of this notice to address the deficiencies. Upon written request of the landowner, the department shall conduct a final in-person review.(e) Noncompletion.--(1) If the eligible landowner fails to complete the 20250HB1007PN1162 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 fencing project within the required time frame or if the project fails final inspection after the opportunity for correction, the commission shall issue a demand for repayment of the disbursement provided under this subchapter within 60 days.(2) Money recovered from the eligible landowner due to noncompletion or noncompliance shall be returned to the fund for future allocation under the program.(3) The commission may take legal action to recover unreturned money if repayment is not received within the 60-day period following a demand for repayment. Any money not repaid within the 60-day period may accrue interest at the legal rate until repaid in full.(f) Extension.--(1) An eligible landowner may request from the department an extension to the time frame for construction.(2) The commission may grant further extension.§ 578. Unlawful acts.(a) Tampering and misuse.--It shall be unlawful for any eligible landowner to:(1) Damage, dismantle or interfere with deterrent fencing constructed under this program without prior approval of the director, within 10 years of the date of certification of compliance.(2) Use program money for any purpose other than as intended under this subchapter.(3) Make a fraudulent or false claim or statement on an application required under this subchapter or violate any provision of this subchapter.(b) Penalties and discretionary repayment.--20250HB1007PN1162 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) At the discretion of the commission, an eligible landowner found to have committed an unlawful act under subsection (a) may be required to repay, in full, all money received under the program.(2) In addition to any discretionary repayment, an individual who violates subsection (a) may be subject to fines and other penalties under section 547 (relating to unlawful acts) or as otherwise provided by law.(3) The commission may, at its discretion, disqualify an individual found to have violated this subchapter from future participation in the program.(4) The department may disqualify an individual who submits more than two applications which have been denied within a five-year period.§ 579. Review.(a) Appeal.--An eligible landowner may appeal to the commission the department's decision regarding any of the following:(1) Certification of crop damage by wildlife.(2) Eligibility determination for cost-share assistance.(3) Fence construction specifications.(4) Fence construction predetermined cost.(5) Review conducted under section 577(d) (relating to disbursement and construction).(b) Review.--Requests for review shall be conducted under Subchapter E (relating to review procedures). A request for review must be submitted within 30 days of receiving the department's decision.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250HB1007PN1162 - 10 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829